Utah statutes.
63C-14-202.   Terms of commission members -- Removal -- Vacancies -- Salaries and expenses.

(1)  Subject to Subsections (3), (4), and (5), the term of commission members is two years.

(2)  A commission member may be reappointed to a successive term.

(3)  Beginning March 2015, the term of commission members shall be staggered so that the term of approximately half of the members expires every year.

(4)  A commission member may be removed from the commission by the person or persons who appointed the member.

(5)  Subject to Subsection (7), a commission member appointed under Subsection 63C-14-201(2)(a) or (b) who leaves office as a legislator may not continue to serve as a commission member.

(6)  A vacancy in the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the appointment of the member whose departure from the commission creates the vacancy.

(7)  A commission member shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and qualified.

(8) (a)  Salaries and expenses of commission members who are legislators shall be paid in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Chapter 3, Expense and Mileage Reimbursement for Authorized Legislative Meetings, Special Sessions, and Veto Override Sessions.

(b)  A commission member who is not a legislator may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service on the commission, but may receive per diem and reimbursement for travel expenses incurred as a commission member at the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107 and rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Enacted by Chapter 62, 2013 General Session

